Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-504
Employee exercising right to family military leave; rights; continuation of benefits.

(1) Any employee who exercises the right to family military leave under the Family Military Leave Act, upon expiration of the leave, shall be entitled to be restored by the employer to the position held by the employee when the leave commenced or to a position with equivalent seniority status, employee benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment. This section does not apply if the employer proves that the employee was not restored because of conditions unrelated to the employee's exercise of rights under the act.

(2) During any family military leave taken under the act, the employer shall make it possible for employees to continue their benefits at the employee's expense. The employer and employee may negotiate for the employer to maintain benefits at the employer's expense for the duration of the leave.

Laws 2007, LB497, § 4.